Utah statutes.
16-10a-1321.   Demand for payment -- Eligibility and notice of intent.
(1)  If a proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under Section
16-10a-1302 is submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting, a shareholder
who wishes to assert dissenters' rights:
(a)  must cause the corporation to receive, before the vote is taken, written
notice of his intent to demand payment for shares if the proposed action is
effectuated; and
(b)  may not vote any of his shares in favor of the proposed action.
(2)  If a proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under Section
16-10a-1302 is authorized without a meeting of shareholders pursuant to
Section 16-10a-704, a shareholder who wishes to assert dissenters' rights may
not execute a writing consenting to the proposed corporate action.
(3)  In order to be entitled to payment for shares under this part, unless
otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution
adopted by the board of directors, a shareholder must have been a shareholder
with respect to the shares for which payment is demanded as of the date the
proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under Section
16-10a-1302 is approved by the shareholders, if shareholder approval is
required, or as of the effective date of the corporate action if the corporate
action is authorized other than by a vote of shareholders.
(4)  A shareholder who does not satisfy the requirements of Subsections (1)
through (3) is not entitled to payment for shares under this part.
